Hawaii statutes.
§832-24 Immunity from service of process in
certain civil actions. A person brought into this State by, or after
waiver of, extradition based on a criminal charge shall not be subject to
service of personal process in civil actions arising out of the same facts as
the criminal proceeding to answer which the person is being or has been
returned, until the person has been convicted in the criminal proceeding, or,
if acquitted, until the person has had reasonable opportunity to return to the
state from which the person was extradited. [L 1941, c 99, §24; RL 1945,
§10654; RL 1955, §250-24; HRS §713-24; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next